Kentucky, session 2025RS, SB169.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 500.120 is amended to read as follows:
(1) (a) In any investigation relating to an offense involving KRS 510.155, 530.064(1)(a), 531.030, 531.040,
531.310, 531.320, 531.335, 531.340, 531.350, 531.360, or 531.370, and upon reasonable cause to
believe that an internet service provider, social networking company, mobile payment service, or cloud
storage service[account] has been used in the exploitation or attempted exploitation of children, or in
any investigation of a violation of KRS 17.546, 508.140, 508.150, 525.070, or 525.080 where there is
reasonable cause to believe that an internet service provider, social networking company, mobile
payment service, or cloud storage service[account] has been used in the commission of the offense, the
Attorney General may issue in writing and cause to be served a subpoena requiring the production and
testimony described in subsection (2) of this section.
(b) In any investigation relating to an offense involving KRS 510.155, 530.064(1)(a), 531.030, 531.040,
531.310, 531.320, 531.335, 531.340, 531.350, 531.360, or 531.370, and upon reasonable cause to
believe that an internet service provider, social networking company, mobile payment service, or cloud
storage service[account] has been used in the exploitation or attempted exploitation of children, the
commissioner of the Department of Kentucky State Police may issue in writing and cause to be served a
subpoena requiring the production and testimony described in subsection (2) of this section.
(2) Except as provided in subsection (3) of this section, a subpoena issued under this section may require the
production of any records or other documentation relevant to the investigation, including:
(a) Electronic mail address;
(b) Internet username;
(c) Internet protocol address;
(d) Name of account holder;
(e) Billing and service address;
(f) Telephone number;
(g) Account status;
(h) Method of access to the internet; and
(i) Automatic number identification records if access is by modem.
(3) The internet service provider, social networking company, mobile payment service, cloud storage service, or
provider of electronic communication service or remote computing service shall not disclose the following
pursuant to a subpoena issued under this section but shall disclose the information in obedience to a warrant:
(a) In-transit electronic communications;
(b) Account memberships related to internet groups, newsgroups, mailing lists or specific areas of interest;
(c) Account passwords; and
(d) Account content including:
1. Electronic mail in any form;
2. Address books, contacts, or buddy lists;
3. Financial records;
4. Internet proxy content or web surfing history; and
5. Files or other digital documents stored with the account or pursuant to use of the account.
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

2 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
(4) At any time before the return date specified on the subpoena, the person summoned may, in the District Court
in which the person resides or does business, petition for an order modifying or setting aside the subpoena, or a
prohibition of disclosure by a court.
(5) A subpoena under this section shall describe the objects required to be produced and shall prescribe a return
date with a reasonable period of time within which the objects can be assembled and made available.
(6) If no case or proceeding arises from the production of records or other documentation pursuant to this section
within a reasonable time after those records or documentation is produced, the Attorney General shall either
destroy the records and documentation or return them to the person who produced them.
(7) A subpoena issued under this section may be served by any person who is at least eighteen (18) years of age
and who is designated in the subpoena to serve it. Service upon a natural person may be made by personal
delivery of the subpoena to him or her. Service may be made upon a corporation or partnership or other
unincorporated association which is subject to suit under its common name, by delivering the subpoena to an
officer, to a managing or general agent, or to any other agent authorized by appointment or by law to receive
service of process. The affidavit of the person serving the subpoena together with a true copy thereof shall be
proof of service.
(8) Except as provided in this section any information, records or data reported or obtained pursuant to subpoena
under this section shall remain confidential and shall not be further disclosed unless in connection with a
criminal case related to the subpoenaed materials.
Signed by Governor March 24, 2025.